North Carolina statutes. Chapter 131E. Health Care Facilities and Services.
Article 14. Disposal of Surplus Property to Aid Other Countries.

§ 131E-250.
Disposition of surplus property by public and State hospitals.

As used in this section, “public hospital” has the same meaning as in

G.S. 159-39

. A State hospital is any hospital operated by the State.

A public hospital or a State hospital may donate medical equipment it determines is no longer needed by the hospital to any of the following if the property so donated is to be used by a hospital or medical facility in another country:

A corporation that is exempt from taxation under section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.

The United States or any agency of it.

The government of a foreign country or any political subdivision of that country.

The United Nations or an agency of it.

Other eleemosynary institutions and groups.

History.

1993, c. 529, s. 7.6; 1995, c. 509, s. 73.

§§ 131E-251 through 131E-254.

Reserved for future codification purposes.